California, session 20252026, AB58.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The San Joaquin Valley historically has been among the lowest regions in educational attainment in the state. Universities in the San Joaquin Valley serve a disproportionate number of first-generation college students, many of whom also come from low-income households.(b) Among University of California campuses, the University of California, Merced is uniquely positioned to serve a population of students from rural areas in the San Joaquin Valley that have been historically isolated, both geographically and socioeconomically, from the rest of the state, especially in regard to high-quality medical care.(c) In addition to the University of California, Merced’s mission to educate students, the university also intends to increase available workforce development opportunities in the San Joaquin Valley in sectors experiencing significant shortages in the region or state.(d) A health workforce assessment of the San Joaquin Valley conducted in 2017 by the University of California, San Francisco found that the region has the lowest ratios of licensed medical doctors, doctors of osteopathy, nurse practitioners, and registered nurses per 100,000 residents in California.(e) To meet the health care needs of the patient population of the San Joaquin Valley, it is the University of California, Merced’s long-term intent to develop an independent medical school. As part of achieving this goal, the University of California, Merced launched, in cooperation with the University of California, San Francisco, the San Joaquin Valley PRIME+ program with its inaugural class of students entering the bachelor of science degree program at the university in 2023.(f) The first combined San Joaquin Valley PRIME+ class will begin their medical training at the University of California, Merced campus through the partnership with the University of California, San Francisco and University of California, Merced Department of Medical Education in 2027, and graduate in 2031. However, achieving an independent medical school at the University of California, Merced, in development with the University of California, San Francisco’s regional campus in the City of Fresno, to address the medically underserved across this region of California will require financial support, faculty and staff, capital investments, and a strong foundation of clinical partnerships for student rotations.SEC. 2. Article 6.4 (commencing with Section 92161) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 57 of Division 9 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 6.4. University of California, Merced School of Medicine92161. (a) The Legislature requests the University of California to submit a report to the Legislature, on or before August 31, 2026, on the financial requirements necessary to expand the current University of California, San Francisco and University of California, Merced medical education collaboration, the San Joaquin Valley PRIME+ program, and to transition the program into a fully independent medical school operated by the University of California, Merced. The report is requested to include all of the following:(1) The projected costs of all of the following:(A) Hiring new permanent full-time faculty and staff.(B) Capital investments in facilities and infrastructure.(C) Procurement of medical equipment and supplies needed to conduct medical research and instruction.(D) Potential development of a program to assist medical residents with applying for physician retention programs.(E) Transitional costs associated with establishing the University of California, Merced medical school.(F) Development of nursing and physician assistant programs.(2) A list of potential health facilities at which students could conduct residencies and what accommodations, if any, are needed to facilitate those residencies.(3) If the facilities identified in paragraph (2) are determined to be insufficient to accommodate student residencies, an assessment of what prospective new medical facilities might be able to meet that need in the future.(4) Timeline and milestones for the completion of an independent school of medicine at the University of California, Merced.(b) A report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation relating to postsecondary education.